Arkansas, session 2025, HB1867.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 41, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 4 — No Government Trespassing Act

15-41-401. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "No Government
Trespassing Act".

15-41-402. Game warden entry onto private land prohibited —
Exceptions.
Notwithstanding any provision of state or federal law, in the course of
performing his or her duties, a game warden may not enter private land unless
the game warden has:
(1) A warrant; or
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(B) of this section,
the explicit or implied permission of an owner or a lessee of the land.
*CRH035*
12/13/2024 9:41:37 AM CRH035

HB1867
(B) A game warden may enter private land without the
explicit or implied permission of an owner or a lessee of the land if
probable cause exists that there is a legitimate need to respond to:
(i) Injured or distressed wildlife;
(ii) An emergency situation;
(iii) An accident; or
(iv) An imminent threat to public safety occurring
on the private land that requires immediate intervention.

15-41-403. Penalties and liability.
(a) Evidence obtained pursuant to a search or seizure conducted in
violation of this subchapter is inadmissible in an administrative or judicial
proceeding.
(b) An arrest or property seizure made pursuant to a search or seizure
conducted in violation of this subchapter is invalid.
(c) A game warden is not immune from suit for a violation of this
subchapter.

15-41-404. Civil relief.
A person who is injured in connection with a violation of this
subchapter may bring an action under the Arkansas Civil Rights Act of 1993, §
16-123-101 et seq., for:
(1) Declaratory relief;
(2) Injunctive relief;
(3) Compensatory damages;
(4) Nominal damages; and
(5) Reasonable attorney’s fees.









12/13/2024 9:41:37 AM